src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AAY_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - jadahlgwáay - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AAY

     jadahlgwáay+V+Sg+Impv: jadahlgwáay
     jadahlgwáay+V+Imm+Pres: jadahlgwáayga
     jadahlgwáay+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáay
     jadahlgwáay+V+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáaygang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Dir+Past: jadahlgwáaygan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Interr+Past: jadahlgwáayaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Indir+Past: jadahlgwáayaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Rel: jadahlgwáays
     jadahlgwáay+V+Rel+Evid: jadahlgwáayaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+NonFact: jadahlgwáayang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Past+NonFact: jadahlgwáayaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: jadahlgwáaygang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Pres+Hab: jadahlgwáayganggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: jadahlgwáaygangang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Dir+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáaygiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+Interr+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáaygaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Indir+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáaygaangaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Interr+Fut+Long: jadahlgwáayäsaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Interr+Fut+Short: jadahlgwáayäs
     jadahlgwáay+V+Simp+Fut: jadahlgwáayäsaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Imm+Fut: jadahlgwáayäsga
     jadahlgwáay+V+Rel+Fut: jadahlgwáayäsaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+Fut+NonFact: jadahlgwáayäsaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Interr+Near+Fut: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaʼáa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Near+Fut: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaʼáang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaasdláa
     jadahlgwáay+V+VNear+Fut: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaasdláang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼuuj
     jadahlgwáay+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼuujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Res: jadahlgwáayäsaaʼuujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼus
     jadahlgwáay+V+Bias+Interr+Past: jadahlgwáayʼujaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼuujaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: jadahlgwáayäsaaʼus
     jadahlgwáay+V+Cert+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Cert+Past: jadahlgwáayʼahlanggan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Cert+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼahlanggiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+Cert+Fut: jadahlgwáayäsaaʼahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+Cert+Rel: jadahlgwáayʼahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+Ints+Past: jadahlgwáaygaaʼahlang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Cont: jadahlgwáaygaaʼahlanggaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Ctfact+Pres: jadahlgwáaygaaʼahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Rflx: jadahlgwáayʼahl
     jadahlgwáay+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: jadahlgwáayäseehl
     jadahlgwáay+V+Pl+Impv: jadahlgwáayʼuu
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼwaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼwaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼwaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Dir+Past: jadahlgwáayʼwägan
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Interr+Past: jadahlgwáayʼaawaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Indir+Past: jadahlgwáayʼaawaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Rel: jadahlgwáayʼwaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: jadahlgwáayʼaawaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+NonFact: jadahlgwáayʼwaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: jadahlgwáayʼaawaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: jadahlgwáaygangʼwaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: jadahlgwáaygangʼwaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: jadahlgwáaygangʼwaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼwägiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼwägaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼwägaangaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: jadahlgwáayʼwaaäsaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: jadahlgwáayʼwaaäs
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaaäsaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaaäsga
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaaäsaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: jadahlgwáayʼwaaäsaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Near+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼwaaʼuuj
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼwaaʼuujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Res: jadahlgwáayʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼwaaʼus
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: jadahlgwáayʼwaaʼujaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaaäsaaʼus
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼwaaʼahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Cert+Past: jadahlgwáayʼwaaʼahlanggan
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: jadahlgwáayʼwaaʼahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Ints+Past: jadahlgwáayʼaawaaʼahlang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Cont: jadahlgwáayʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Rflx: jadahlgwáayʼwaaʼahl
     jadahlgwáay+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: jadahlgwáayʼwaaäseehl
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: jadahlgwáayʼang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangga
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Dir+Past: jadahlgwáayʼanggan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Interr+Past: jadahlgwáayʼaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Indir+Past: jadahlgwáayʼaangaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Rel: jadahlgwáayʼans
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: jadahlgwáayʼaangaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+NonFact: jadahlgwáayʼangang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: jadahlgwáayʼaangaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: jadahlgwáaygangʼanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: jadahlgwáaygangʼangang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼanggiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼanggaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼanggaangaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: jadahlgwáayʼangäsaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: jadahlgwáayʼangäs
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼangäsaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼangäsga
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼangäsaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: jadahlgwáayʼangäsaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaaʼáng
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Near+Fut: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaaʼánggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: jadahlgwáayang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼuuj
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼuujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Res: jadahlgwáayʼangäsaaʼuujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼus
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: jadahlgwáayʼangʼujaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼangʼuujaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼangäsaaʼus
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼaangʼahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Cert+Past: jadahlgwáayʼaangʼahlanggan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼangäsaaʼahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: jadahlgwáayʼaangʼahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Ints+Past: jadahlgwáayʼaangaaʼahlang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Cont: jadahlgwáayʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Rflx: jadahlgwáayʼaangʼahl
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: jadahlgwáayʼangäseehl
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: jadahlgwáayʼangʼuu
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwägan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: jadahlgwáayʼangʼaawaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: jadahlgwáayʼangʼaawaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: jadahlgwáayʼangʼaawaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: jadahlgwáayʼangʼaawaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: jadahlgwáaygangʼangʼwaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: jadahlgwáaygangʼangʼwaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: jadahlgwáaygangʼangʼwaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwägiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwägaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwägaangaan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaäsaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaäs
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaäsaang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaäsga
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaäsaas
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Res: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaʼus
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: jadahlgwáayʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: jadahlgwáayʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: jadahlgwáayʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaʼahl
     jadahlgwáay+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: jadahlgwáayʼangʼwaaäseehl
